Texas, session 892, HB154.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Title 10, Government Code, is amended by adding Subtitle Y to read as follows: SUBTITLE Y. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS CHAPTER 2901. RECOGNITION OF JUDEA AND SAMARIA Sec. 2901.001.  DEFINITIONS. In this chapter: (1)  "Official agency statement" means a rule, official guidance, press release, written communication, or other work product prepared by a state agency. (2)  "State agency" means an office, department, commission, board, or other agency of any branch of state government. Sec. 2901.002.  LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the legislature to: (1)  refer to the land liberated by Israel from Jordan during the 1967 Six-Day War by the land's historical names of "Judea and Samaria," with the land south of Jerusalem referenced as "Judea" and the land north of Jerusalem referenced as "Samaria"; and (2)  prohibit use of the term "West Bank" in any official agency statement. Sec. 2901.003.  PROHIBITED TERMINOLOGY. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a state agency in any official agency statement may not include the term "West Bank" and may only use the terms "Judea and Samaria," "Judea," or "Samaria," as applicable. (b)  A state agency may use the term "West Bank" in an official agency statement if the executive head of the agency: (1)  determines use of the term "West Bank" in the statement is in the interest of this state; and (2)  submits not later than the 30th day after the date the executive head makes a determination under Subdivision (1) a written explanation of the decision to the legislature, or if the legislature is not in session, to the governor. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.